Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 840-1A of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services (OMES)
shall be dissolved effective January 1, 2026, and duties reassigned
to other state agencies.
B. There is hereby created until January 1, 2026, in accordance
with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset law, the OMES Duties
Req. No. 10778 Page 1

Inte rvention Now (ODIN) Task Force for the purpose of collaborative
research, planning, and providing information to the Legislature and
the Governor on how best to reassign the duties of OMES.
C. The ODIN Task Force shall consist of fifteen (15) members:
1. Three members appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives;
2. Three members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate;
3. Three members appointed by the Governor;
4. The Executive Director of OMES;
5. The Deputy Director and Chief Transformation Office, of
OMES;
6. The Deputy Director of Legislative and Legal Services of
OMES;
7. The State Chief Financial Officer;
8. The State Comptroller; and
9. OMES General Counsel.
D. The ODIN Task Force shall provide its recommendations to the
Legislature and the Governor by November 1, 2025.
E. The Oklahoma House of Representatives shall provide staff to
assist in meetings of the ODIN Task Force as needed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 10778 Page 2

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10778 MJ 01/08/25




















Req. No. 10778 Page 3